Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5009.7 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Medical records shall be retained a minimum of ten (10)
years beyond the date the patient was last seen or a minimum of
three (3) years beyond the date of the patient's death. Records of
newborns or minors shall be retained three (3) years past the age of
majority.


HB1067 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. 1. Health care providers may microfilm, put on optical
disk, or adopt similar recording technology to record the medical
records and destroy the original record in order to conserve space.
2. Records reconstituted from the technology employed to
conserve space shall be considered the same as the original and the
retention of the technically retained record constitutes compliance
with preservation laws.
3. The minimum contents of a medical record to be recorded
shall be as required by OAC 310:667-19-8.
4. In the event of closure of a health care providers' office,
the health care provider shall inform the State Department of Health
of the disposition of the records. Disposition shall be in a manner
to protect the integrity of the information contained in the medical
record. These records shall be retained and disposed of in a manner
consistent with the statute of limitations.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/04/2025 – DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.






HB1067 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.